Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2187.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 226(e) of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929, is amended to read:12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728 Section 226. Criminal History Background Checks of Employes and Contractors with Access to Federal Tax Information.--* * *(e) An individual who has been determined suitable to access Federal tax information under this section shall resubmit to a criminal history background check under subsections (a) and (b) within [ten] five years of the individual's last check under this section, unless the agency participates in a program exempting employes from clearance.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2187PN2850 - 2 - 12345678910